Hawaii statutes.
§125C-2 "Shortage" defined.
As used in this chapter, unless otherwise indicated by the context, a
"shortage" exists whenever the governor determines that there is an
increase in the demand for any petroleum product or there is a decrease in the
available supply for the petroleum product in question, or both; and such
decrease in the available supply of or increase in the demand for the petroleum
product in question, or both, may cause a major adverse impact on the economy,
public order, or the health, welfare, or safety of the people of Hawaii and may
not be responsibly managed within the free market distribution system.
Further, the governor may require importers of any petroleum product or other
fuel to monitor and report to the department of business, economic development,
and tourism relevant supply and demand data. The governor shall review the
status of a shortage within one hundred twenty days after the governor's
initial determination of a shortage as defined under this chapter; thenceforth,
the governor shall conduct a review of the shortage to make a new determination
every thirty days until a shortage no longer exists. [L 1975, c 38, pt of §1;
am L 1979, c 142, §1; am L 1984, c 238, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 102, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next